Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 5. Small Renewable Energy Projects.

§ 10.1-1197.5.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Energy storage facility”
means energy storage equipment or technology that is capable of absorbing energy, storing such energy for a period of time, and redelivering energy after it has been stored.

“Small renewable energy project”
means (i) an electrical generation facility with a rated capacity not exceeding 150 megawatts that generates electricity only from sunlight or wind; (ii) an electrical generation facility with a rated capacity not exceeding 100 megawatts that generates electricity only from falling water, wave motion, tides, or geothermal power; (iii) an electrical generation facility with a rated capacity not exceeding 20 megawatts that generates electricity only from biomass, energy from waste, or municipal solid waste; (iv) an energy storage facility that uses electrochemical cells to convert chemical energy with a rated capacity not exceeding 150 megawatts; or (v) a hybrid project composed of an electrical generation facility that meets the parameters established in clause (i), (ii), or (iii) and an energy storage facility that meets the parameters established in clause (iv).

History.

2009, cc. 808, 854; 2017, c. 368; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 419.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, cc. 808 and 854, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to any small renewable energy project that has applied for or been granted approval by the State Corporation Commission prior to the effective date of regulations promulgated by the Department of Environmental Quality, as set forth in this act; provided, however, that a small renewable energy project that has not yet received a final order from the State Corporation Commission shall not be precluded from withdrawing its application at the State Corporation Commission and filing without prejudice with the Department of Environmental Quality for a permit-by-rule pursuant to this act.”

Acts 2011, c. 771, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That in order to promote solar energy through distributed generation, the State Corporation Commission shall exercise its existing authority to consider for approval, after notice to all affected parties and opportunity for hearing, petitions filed by a utility to construct and operate distributed solar generation facilities and to offer special tariffs to facilitate customer-owned distributed solar generation as alternatives to net energy metering, with an aggregate amount of rated generating capacity of up to 0.20 percent of each electric utility’s adjusted Virginia peak load for the calendar year 2010. Such petitions may be made during the period of July 1, 2011, through July 1, 2015, and the Commission, on its own motion, may extend this period an additional year for good cause. Each distributed solar generation installation approved pursuant to this section shall be considered to be part of a demonstration program to assess benefits to the utility’s distribution system, including constrained or high load growth circuits, for a period of five years from the date each installation becomes operational. Thereafter each installation shall cease to be part of a demonstration program and, in the case of a utility-owned installation, shall continue to operate as a utility-owned generating facility, and in the case of a customer-owned installation, shall continue to provide power to the utility pursuant to the terms of the agreed upon tariff arrangement. Subject to review by the Commission, such utility-owned distributed solar generation facilities and tariffs for power generated from customer-owned distributed solar installations shall be prioritized in areas identified by the utility as areas where localized solar generation would provide benefits to the utility’s distribution system, including constrained or high-growth areas. The Commission shall approve such programs or distributed generation facilities if it determines that the programs or facilities, including those targeting constrained or high load growth areas, are reasonably designed to be in furtherance of the public interest.

“§ 2. A utility participating in demonstration programs pursuant to § 1 of this act shall use reasonable efforts to ensure that at least four of the distributed solar installation sites included in the demonstration projects shall be in a community setting, which shall include, but not be limited to, to the extent permitted by law, participation by local governments, schools, community associations, neighborhood associations, or nonprofit organizations. The capacity of each such community installation shall not exceed 500 kilowatts.

“§ 3. When a utility proposes solar distributed generation resources as permitted in § 1 of this act comprised of multiple installations combined collectively, the Commission shall consider such projects as one small non-combustible renewable power generation facility for purposes of project approval pursuant to §§

10.1-1197.5

,

10.1-1197.8

, 56-265.2, 56-580 and 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia. A ‘small non-combustible renewable power generation facility’ is a small renewable energy project that generates electricity from sunlight and may consist of one or more installations distributed on separate structures or facilities, whether such installations are treated each as a stand-alone small renewable energy project or are combined and treated collectively as one small renewable energy project.

“§ 4. The Commission shall provide annual reports on any demonstration programs approved pursuant to this act to the Governor and the chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Commerce and Labor.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 419, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Environmental Quality shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective no later than January 1, 2022. The Department’s initial adoption of regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq. of the Code of Virginia), except that the Department of Environmental Quality shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the regulations prior to adoption.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 368, substituted “150 megawatts” for “100 megawatts” in clause (i), inserted “(ii) an electrical generation facility with a rated capacity not exceeding 100 megawatts that generates electricity only from” and made related changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 419, effective July 1, 2021, reorganized the section into a list format; added the definition for “Energy storage facility”; and in the definition for “Small renewable energy project,” added clauses (iv) and (v); and made stylistic changes.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Authority of Department of Environmental Quality to approve renewable energy projects. —

Because the Department of Environmental Quality is directed to assess whether a submitted application for a small renewable energy project meets the requirements of “the applicable permit by rule regulations,” the Department of Environmental Quality may treat the locality certification requirement of subdivision B 2 of §

10.1-1197.6

as inapplicable when a proposed wind project will be located in state waters or on state-owned submerged lands and may authorize a project if the agency determines that the project applicant has met all other applicable requirements. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. David K. Paylor, Director, Virginia Department of Environmental Quality, 10-091, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 88 (12/30/10).

Authority of localities to regulate state-owned submerged lands. —

Virginia localities do not have the authority to extend the application of their land use ordinances to state-owned submerged lands, therefore, for small renewable energy projects located on or in the waters above state-owned bottomland, there are no “applicable land use ordinances” for purposes of the certification requirement of subdivision B 2 of §

10.1-1197.6

. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. David K. Paylor, Director, Virginia Department of Environmental Quality, 10-091, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 88 (12/30/10).

§ 10.1-1197.6.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Permit by rule for small renewable energy projects.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

10.1-1186.2:1

, the Department shall develop, by regulations to be effective as soon as practicable, but not later than July 1, 2012, a permit by rule or permits by rule if it is determined by the Department that one or more such permits by rule are necessary for the construction and operation of small renewable energy projects, including such conditions and standards necessary to protect the Commonwealth’s natural resources. If the Department determines that more than a single permit by rule is necessary, the Department initially shall develop the permit by rule for wind energy, which shall be effective as soon as practicable, but not later than January 1, 2011. Subsequent permits by rule regulations shall be effective as soon as practicable.

The conditions for issuance of the permit by rule for small renewable energy projects shall include:

A notice of intent provided by the applicant, to be published in the Virginia Register, that a person intends to submit the necessary documentation for a permit by rule for a small renewable energy project;

A certification by the governing body of the locality or localities wherein the small renewable energy project will be located that the project complies with all applicable land use ordinances;

Copies of all interconnection studies undertaken by the regional transmission organization or transmission owner, or both, on behalf of the small renewable energy project;

A copy of the final interconnection agreement between the small renewable energy project and the regional transmission organization or transmission owner indicating that the connection of the small renewable energy project will not cause a reliability problem for the system. If the final agreement is not available, the most recent interconnection study shall be sufficient for the purposes of this section. When a final interconnection agreement is complete, it shall be provided to the Department. The Department shall forward a copy of the agreement or study to the State Corporation Commission;

A certification signed by a professional engineer licensed in Virginia that the maximum generation capacity of the small renewable energy project by (i) an electrical generation facility that generates electricity only from sunlight or wind as designed does not exceed 150 megawatts; (ii) an electrical generation facility that generates electricity only from falling water, wave motion, tides, or geothermal power as designed does not exceed 100 megawatts; or (iii) an electrical generation facility that generates electricity only from biomass, energy from waste, or municipal solid waste as designed does not exceed 20 megawatts;

An analysis of potential environmental impacts of the small renewable energy project’s operations on attainment of national ambient air quality standards;

Where relevant, an analysis of the beneficial and adverse impacts of the proposed project on natural resources. For wildlife, that analysis shall be based on information on the presence, activity, and migratory behavior of wildlife to be collected at the site for a period of time dictated by the site conditions and biology of the wildlife being studied, not exceeding 12 months;

If the Department determines that the information collected pursuant to subdivision B 7 indicates that significant adverse impacts to wildlife or historic resources are likely, the submission of a mitigation plan detailing reasonable actions to be taken by the owner or operator to avoid, minimize, or otherwise mitigate such impacts, and to measure the efficacy of those actions;

A certification signed by a professional engineer licensed in Virginia that the small renewable energy project is designed in accordance with all of the standards that are established in the regulations applicable to the permit by rule;

An operating plan describing how any standards established in the regulations applicable to the permit by rule will be achieved;

A detailed site plan with project location maps that show the location of all components of the small renewable energy project, including any towers. Changes to the site plan that occur after the applicant has submitted an application shall be allowed by the Department without restarting the application process, if the changes were the result of optimizing technical, environmental, and cost considerations, do not materially alter the environmental effects caused by the facility, or do not alter any other environmental permits that the Commonwealth requires the applicant to obtain;

A certification signed by the applicant that the small renewable energy project has applied for or obtained all necessary environmental permits;

A requirement that the applicant hold a public meeting. The public meeting shall be held in the locality or, if the project is located in more than one locality in a place proximate to the location of the proposed project. Following the public meeting, the applicant shall prepare a report summarizing the issues raised at the meeting, including any written comments received. The report shall be provided to the Department; and

A 30-day public review and comment period prior to authorization of the project.

The Department’s regulations shall establish a schedule of fees, to be payable by the owner or operator of the small renewable energy project regulated under this article, which fees shall be assessed for the purpose of funding the costs of administering and enforcing the provisions of this article associated with such operations including, but not limited to, the inspection and monitoring of such projects to ensure compliance with this article.

The owner or operator of a small renewable energy project regulated under this article shall be assessed a permit fee in accordance with the criteria set forth in the Department’s regulations. Such fees shall include an additional amount to cover the Department’s costs of inspecting such projects.

The fees collected pursuant to this article shall be used only for the purposes specified in this article and for funding purposes authorized by this article to abate impairments or impacts on the Commonwealth’s natural resources directly caused by small renewable energy projects.

There is hereby established a special, nonreverting fund in the state treasury to be known as the Small Renewable Energy Project Fee Fund, hereafter referred to as the Fund. Notwithstanding the provisions of § 2.2-1802, all moneys collected pursuant to this §

10.1-1197.6

shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Fund. Any moneys remaining in the Fund shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Interest earned on such moneys shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. The Fund shall be exempt from statewide indirect costs charged and collected by the Department of Accounts.

After the effective date of regulations adopted pursuant to this section, no person shall erect, construct, materially modify or operate a small renewable energy project except in accordance with this article or Title 56 if the small renewable energy project was approved pursuant to Title 56.

Any small renewable energy project shall be eligible for permit by rule under this section if the project is proposed, developed, constructed, or purchased by a person that is not a utility regulated pursuant to Title 56.

Any small renewable energy project commencing operations after July 1, 2017, shall be eligible for permits by rule under this section and is exempt from State Corporation Commission environmental review or permitting in accordance with subsection B of §

10.1-1197.8

or other applicable law if the project is proposed, developed, constructed, or purchased by:

A public utility if the project’s costs are not recovered from Virginia jurisdictional customers under base rates, a fuel factor charge under § 56-249.6, or a rate adjustment clause under subdivision A 6 of § 56-585.1; or

A utility aggregation cooperative formed under Article 2 (§ 56-231.38 et seq.) of Chapter 9.1 of Title 56.

History.

2009, cc. 808, 854; 2017, c. 368.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, c. 688, cl. 2 provides: “That pursuant to subdivisions B 7 and 8 of
§

10.1-1197.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, the Department of Environmental Quality (the Department), in consultation with the Department of Forestry, the State Corporation Commission, the Department of Energy, the Virginia Economic Development Partnership Authority, and other relevant stakeholders, shall convene an advisory panel to assist in further developing regulations regarding criteria to determine if a significant adverse impact to prime agricultural soils or forest lands is likely to occur as a result of a proposed solar project that is a small renewable energy project and criteria for an applicant of a solar project to address in a plan to mitigate any significant adverse impacts to soils and lands. In developing regulations regarding plans to mitigate any significant impacts to prime agricultural soils or forest lands, the advisory panel shall consider, but not be limited to, the following factors in determining appropriate mitigation techniques or criteria to be included in an applicant's mitigation plan: (i) the mitigation techniques to avoid, minimize, or otherwise mitigate any such impacts; (ii) the cost of mitigation relative to the project cost, including the costs of proposed mitigation to rate payers; (iii) onsite minimization of impacts; (iv) payment of in-lieu fee funds for mitigation; (v) the impact on the local agricultural or forestry economy when such soils or lands are displaced; (vi) the loss of ecosystem benefits; (vii) noncompliance with Virginia's Watershed Implementation Plan III goals on the Chesapeake Bay TMDL; and (viii) noncompliance with other water quality criteria and standards. Such criteria shall include reasonable actions to be taken by the applicant to avoid, minimize, or otherwise mitigate any such impacts to prime agricultural soils or forest lands, but in the event that avoidance by the applicant is not reasonable, the applicant for the solar project that is a small renewable energy project shall be afforded the opportunity to minimize or otherwise mitigate any significant adverse impacts to prime agricultural soils or forest lands. The advisory panel shall also consider a process by which an applicant may satisfy its mitigation obligations by agreement with a locality if such mitigation requirements conform to the regulations established by the Department pursuant to this enactment and when such mitigation requirements are included in (a) a siting agreement and approved by a local governing body pursuant to subsection B of
§

15.2-2316.7

of the Code of Virginia or (b) zoning use conditions approved by the locality pursuant to
§

15.2-2288.8

of the Code of Virginia. The Department shall adopt such final regulations no later than December 31, 2024. Relevant stakeholders shall include but not be limited to representatives from the Virginia Association of Counties, the Virginia Farm Bureau Federation, the Virginia Agribusiness Council, the Virginia Forestry Association, the Piedmont Environmental Council, The Nature Conservancy, the Virginia Forest Products Association, the Chesapeake Solar and Storage Association, the American Clean Power Association, Advanced Energy Economy, AES Corporation, the Data Center Coalition, solar project engineers, electric utilities, and other stakeholders deemed relevant by the Department, the Department of Forestry, the Department of Energy, the State Corporation Commission, or the Virginia Economic Development Partnership Authority. The advisory panel shall submit a report to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committees on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources and Commerce and Energy and the Senate Committees on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources and Commerce and Labor no later than December 1, 2022.”

Acts
2022, c. 688, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective immediately upon the adoption of regulations pursuant to the second enactment of this act.”

Acts
2022, c. 688, cl. 4 provides: “That any small renewable energy project for which an initial interconnection request application has been received and accepted by the regional transmission organization or electric utility by December 31, 2024, shall not be subject to the provisions of this act.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 368 inserted clause (i) and redesignated the remaining clauses accordingly, deleted “sunlight, wind” following “electricity only from” in clause (ii); added subsections H and I; and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 688, added the last sentence of subdivision A 7; in subdivision A 8, substituted “subdivision 7” for “subdivision B 7”, deleted “or” following “wildlife”, inserted “prime agricultural soils, or forest lands” following “historic resources”, inserted "if a draft plan was not provided by the applicant as part of the initial application, with a 45-day public comment period” following “mitigation plan” and added the last sentence; added subsection J; and made stylistic changes.

§ 10.1-1197.6.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Permit by rule for small renewable energy projects.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

10.1-1186.2:1

, the Department shall develop, by regulations to be effective as soon as practicable, but not later than July 1, 2012, a permit by rule or permits by rule if it is determined by the Department that one or more such permits by rule are necessary for the construction and operation of small renewable energy projects, including such conditions and standards necessary to protect the Commonwealth’s natural resources. If the Department determines that more than a single permit by rule is necessary, the Department initially shall develop the permit by rule for wind energy, which shall be effective as soon as practicable, but not later than January 1, 2011. Subsequent permits by rule regulations shall be effective as soon as practicable.

The conditions for issuance of the permit by rule for small renewable energy projects shall include:

A notice of intent provided by the applicant, to be published in the Virginia Register, that a person intends to submit the necessary documentation for a permit by rule for a small renewable energy project;

A certification by the governing body of the locality or localities wherein the small renewable energy project will be located that the project complies with all applicable land use ordinances;

Copies of all interconnection studies undertaken by the regional transmission organization or transmission owner, or both, on behalf of the small renewable energy project;

A copy of the final interconnection agreement between the small renewable energy project and the regional transmission organization or transmission owner indicating that the connection of the small renewable energy project will not cause a reliability problem for the system. If the final agreement is not available, the most recent interconnection study shall be sufficient for the purposes of this section. When a final interconnection agreement is complete, it shall be provided to the Department. The Department shall forward a copy of the agreement or study to the State Corporation Commission;

A certification signed by a professional engineer licensed in Virginia that the maximum generation capacity of the small renewable energy project by (i) an electrical generation facility that generates electricity only from sunlight or wind as designed does not exceed 150 megawatts; (ii) an electrical generation facility that generates electricity only from falling water, wave motion, tides, or geothermal power as designed does not exceed 100 megawatts; or (iii) an electrical generation facility that generates electricity only from biomass, energy from waste, or municipal solid waste as designed does not exceed 20 megawatts;

An analysis of potential environmental impacts of the small renewable energy project’s operations on attainment of national ambient air quality standards;

Where relevant, an analysis of the beneficial and adverse impacts of the proposed project on natural resources. For wildlife, that analysis shall be based on information on the presence, activity, and migratory behavior of wildlife to be collected at the site for a period of time dictated by the site conditions and biology of the wildlife being studied, not exceeding 12 months. For prime agricultural soils and forest land, that analysis shall be required if a proposed project would disturb more than 10 acres of prime agricultural soils or 50 acres of contiguous forest lands, or if it would disturb forest lands enrolled in a program for forestry preservation pursuant to subdivision 2 of §

58.1-3233

;

If the Department determines that the information collected pursuant to subdivision 7 indicates that significant adverse impacts to wildlife, historic resources, prime agricultural soils, or forest lands are likely, the submission of a mitigation plan, if a draft plan was not provided by the applicant as part of the initial application, with a 45-day public comment period detailing reasonable actions to be taken by the owner or operator to avoid, minimize, or otherwise mitigate such impacts, and to measure the efficacy of those actions. A project will be deemed to have a significant adverse impact if it would disturb more than 10 acres of prime agricultural soils or 50 acres of contiguous forest lands, or if it would disturb forest lands enrolled in a program for forestry preservation pursuant to subdivision 2 of §

58.1-3233

;

A certification signed by a professional engineer licensed in Virginia that the small renewable energy project is designed in accordance with all of the standards that are established in the regulations applicable to the permit by rule;

An operating plan describing how any standards established in the regulations applicable to the permit by rule will be achieved;

A detailed site plan with project location maps that show the location of all components of the small renewable energy project, including any towers. Changes to the site plan that occur after the applicant has submitted an application shall be allowed by the Department without restarting the application process, if the changes were the result of optimizing technical, environmental, and cost considerations, do not materially alter the environmental effects caused by the facility, or do not alter any other environmental permits that the Commonwealth requires the applicant to obtain;

A certification signed by the applicant that the small renewable energy project has applied for or obtained all necessary environmental permits;

A requirement that the applicant hold a public meeting. The public meeting shall be held in the locality or, if the project is located in more than one locality in a place proximate to the location of the proposed project. Following the public meeting, the applicant shall prepare a report summarizing the issues raised at the meeting, including any written comments received. The report shall be provided to the Department; and

A 30-day public review and comment period prior to authorization of the project.

The Department’s regulations shall establish a schedule of fees, to be payable by the owner or operator of the small renewable energy project regulated under this article, which fees shall be assessed for the purpose of funding the costs of administering and enforcing the provisions of this article associated with such operations including, but not limited to, the inspection and monitoring of such projects to ensure compliance with this article.

The owner or operator of a small renewable energy project regulated under this article shall be assessed a permit fee in accordance with the criteria set forth in the Department’s regulations. Such fees shall include an additional amount to cover the Department’s costs of inspecting such projects.

The fees collected pursuant to this article shall be used only for the purposes specified in this article and for funding purposes authorized by this article to abate impairments or impacts on the Commonwealth’s natural resources directly caused by small renewable energy projects.

There is hereby established a special, nonreverting fund in the state treasury to be known as the Small Renewable Energy Project Fee Fund, hereafter referred to as the Fund. Notwithstanding the provisions of § 2.2-1802, all moneys collected pursuant to this §

10.1-1197.6

shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Fund. Any moneys remaining in the Fund shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Interest earned on such moneys shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. The Fund shall be exempt from statewide indirect costs charged and collected by the Department of Accounts.

After the effective date of regulations adopted pursuant to this section, no person shall erect, construct, materially modify or operate a small renewable energy project except in accordance with this article or Title 56 if the small renewable energy project was approved pursuant to Title 56.

Any small renewable energy project shall be eligible for permit by rule under this section if the project is proposed, developed, constructed, or purchased by a person that is not a utility regulated pursuant to Title 56.

Any small renewable energy project commencing operations after July 1, 2017, shall be eligible for permits by rule under this section and is exempt from State Corporation Commission environmental review or permitting in accordance with subsection B of §

10.1-1197.8

or other applicable law if the project is proposed, developed, constructed, or purchased by:

A public utility if the project’s costs are not recovered from Virginia jurisdictional customers under base rates, a fuel factor charge under § 56-249.6, or a rate adjustment clause under subdivision A 6 of § 56-585.1; or

A utility aggregation cooperative formed under Article 2 (§ 56-231.38 et seq.) of Chapter 9.1 of Title 56.

For purposes of this section, “prime agricultural soils” means soils recognized as prime farmland by the U.S. Department of Agriculture, and “forest land” has the same meaning as provided in §

10.1-1178

, except that any parcel shall be considered forest lands if it was forested at least two years prior to the Department’s receipt of a permit application.

History.

2009, cc. 808, 854; 2017, c. 368; 2022, c. 688.

§ 10.1-1197.7.
Review and authorization of projects.

Upon submission of a complete application, the Department, after consultation with other agencies in the Secretariat of Natural and Historic Resources before authorizing the project, shall conduct an assessment of whether the application meets the requirements of the applicable permit by rule regulations. If the Department determines that the application is deficient, it promptly shall notify the applicant in writing and specify the deficiencies.

Any interested party, including an applicant for a permit, who has participated in a proceeding for a permit to construct or operate a small renewable energy project under procedures adopted by the Department pursuant to this section, and who is aggrieved by the final decision of the Department, shall have the remedies provided by the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.).

History.

2009, cc. 808, 854.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Secretariat of Natural and Historic Resources” was substituted for “Secretariat of Natural Resources” to conform to the name change by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 401.

§ 10.1-1197.8.
Limitation of State Corporation Commission authority.

If the owner or operator of a small renewable energy project to whom the Department has authorized a permit by rule pursuant to this article is not a utility regulated pursuant to Title 56, then the State Corporation Commission shall not have jurisdiction to review the small renewable energy project or to condition the construction or operation of a small renewable energy project upon the State Corporation Commission’s issuance of any permit or certificate under any provision of Title 56, provided that the State Corporation Commission shall retain jurisdiction to resolve requests for joint use of the rights of way of public service corporations pursuant to § 56-259 and denials of requests for interconnection of facilities pursuant to § 56-578.

If the owner or operator of a small renewable energy project for which the Department has authorized a permit by rule pursuant to this article is a utility regulated pursuant to Title 56, such small renewable energy project shall be exempt from any provision of § 56-46.1 and any corresponding provision of subsection D of § 56-580 or Chapter 10.1 (§ 56-265.1 et seq.) of Title 56 that requires environmental review and permitting by the State Corporation Commission. An owner or operator of a small renewable energy project that is granted a permit by rule pursuant to subsection I of §

10.1-1197.6

, shall not be required to obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity pursuant to subsection D of § 56-580 or the Utility Facilities Act (§ 56-265.1 et seq.). Nothing in this section shall affect the jurisdiction of the State Corporation Commission regarding a utility that is not eligible for a permit by rule, or the requirement of such utility to obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity.

History.

2009, cc. 808, 854; 2017, c. 368.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, c. 771, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That in order to promote solar energy through distributed generation, the State Corporation Commission shall exercise its existing authority to consider for approval, after notice to all affected parties and opportunity for hearing, petitions filed by a utility to construct and operate distributed solar generation facilities and to offer special tariffs to facilitate customer-owned distributed solar generation as alternatives to net energy metering, with an aggregate amount of rated generating capacity of up to 0.20 percent of each electric utility’s adjusted Virginia peak load for the calendar year 2010. Such petitions may be made during the period of July 1, 2011, through July 1, 2015, and the Commission, on its own motion, may extend this period an additional year for good cause. Each distributed solar generation installation approved pursuant to this section shall be considered to be part of a demonstration program to assess benefits to the utility’s distribution system, including constrained or high load growth circuits, for a period of five years from the date each installation becomes operational. Thereafter each installation shall cease to be part of a demonstration program and, in the case of a utility-owned installation, shall continue to operate as a utility-owned generating facility, and in the case of a customer-owned installation, shall continue to provide power to the utility pursuant to the terms of the agreed upon tariff arrangement. Subject to review by the Commission, such utility-owned distributed solar generation facilities and tariffs for power generated from customer-owned distributed solar installations shall be prioritized in areas identified by the utility as areas where localized solar generation would provide benefits to the utility’s distribution system, including constrained or high-growth areas. The Commission shall approve such programs or distributed generation facilities if it determines that the programs or facilities, including those targeting constrained or high load growth areas, are reasonably designed to be in furtherance of the public interest.

“§ 2. A utility participating in demonstration programs pursuant to § 1 of this act shall use reasonable efforts to ensure that at least four of the distributed solar installation sites included in the demonstration projects shall be in a community setting, which shall include, but not be limited to, to the extent permitted by law, participation by local governments, schools, community associations, neighborhood associations, or nonprofit organizations. The capacity of each such community installation shall not exceed 500 kilowatts.

“§ 3. When a utility proposes solar distributed generation resources as permitted in § 1 of this act comprised of multiple installations combined collectively, the Commission shall consider such projects as one small non-combustible renewable power generation facility for purposes of project approval pursuant to §§

10.1-1197.5

,

10.1-1197.8

, 56-265.2, 56-580 and 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia. A ‘small non-combustible renewable power generation facility’ is a small renewable energy project that generates electricity from sunlight and may consist of one or more installations distributed on separate structures or facilities, whether such installations are treated each as a stand-alone small renewable energy project or are combined and treated collectively as one small renewable energy project.

“§ 4. The Commission shall provide annual reports on any demonstration programs approved pursuant to this act to the Governor and the chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Commerce and Labor.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 368, in subsection B, substituted “for which” for “to whom” in the first sentence, and rewrote the second sentence, which read: “An operator of a small renewable energy project that is a utility regulated pursuant to Title 56, shall nonetheless be required to obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity pursuant to subsection D of § 56-580”; and added the last sentence.